California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
Notwithstanding Section 632 of the Penal Code, a consumer, or his or her parent, guardian, conservator, or authorized representative, shall have the right to record electronically the proceedings of the individual program plan meetings on an audiotape recorder. The consumer, or his or her parent, guardian, conservator, or authorized representative, shall notify the regional center of their intent to record a meeting at least 24 hours prior to the meeting. If the regional center initiates the notice of intent to audiotape record a meeting and the consumer, or his or her parent, guardian, conservator, or authorized representative, refuses to attend the meeting because it will be tape recorded, the meeting shall not be recorded on an audiotape recorder. However, the regional center shall have the right to electronically record the meeting when notice of intent to record has been given by the consumer or on the consumer’s behalf.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 512, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

4647.

(a) Pursuant to Section 4640.7, service coordination shall include those activities necessary to implement an individual program plan, including, but not limited to, participation in the individual program plan process; assurance that the planning team considers all appropriate options for meeting each individual program plan objective; securing, through purchasing or by obtaining from generic agencies or other resources, services and supports specified in the person’s individual program plan; coordination of service and support programs; collection and dissemination of information; and monitoring implementation of the plan to ascertain that objectives have been fulfilled and to assist in revising the plan as necessary.

(b) The regional center shall assign a service coordinator who shall be responsible for implementing, overseeing, and monitoring each individual program plan. The service coordinator may be an employee of the regional center or may be a qualified individual or employee of an agency with whom the regional center has contracted to provide service coordination services, or persons described in Section 4647.2. The regional center shall provide the consumer or, where appropriate, his or her parents, legal guardian, or conservator or authorized representative, with written notification of any permanent change in the assigned service coordinator within 10 business days. No person shall continue to serve as a service coordinator for any individual program plan unless there is agreement by all parties that the person should continue to serve as service coordinator.

(c) Where appropriate, a consumer or the consumer’s parents or other family members, legal guardian, or conservator, may perform all or part of the duties of the service coordinator described in this section if the regional center director agrees and it is feasible.

(d) If any person described in subdivision (c) is designated as the service coordinator, that person shall not deviate from the agreed-upon program plan and shall provide any reasonable information and reports required by the regional center director.

(e) If any person described in subdivision (c) is designated as the service coordinator, the regional center shall provide ongoing information and support as necessary, to assist the person to perform all or part of the duties of service coordinator.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 146, Sec. 26.   Effective July 22, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

4648.

In order to achieve the stated objectives of a consumer’s individual program plan, the regional center shall conduct activities, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(a) Securing needed services and supports.

(1) It is the intent of the Legislature that services and supports assist individuals with developmental disabilities to achieve the greatest self-sufficiency possible and to exercise personal choices. The regional center shall secure services and supports that meet the needs of the consumer, as determined in the consumer’s individual program plan, and within the context of the individual program plan, the planning team shall give highest preference to those services and supports that would allow
 minors with developmental disabilities to live with their families, adult persons with developmental disabilities to live as independently as possible in the community, and that allow all consumers to interact with persons without disabilities in positive, meaningful ways.

(2) In implementing individual program plans, regional centers, through the planning team, shall first consider services and supports in natural community, home, work, and recreational settings. Services and supports shall be flexible and individually tailored to the consumer and, if appropriate, the consumer’s family.

(3) (A) A regional center may, pursuant to vendorization or a contract, purchase services or supports for a consumer from an individual or agency that the regional center and consumer or, if appropriate, the consumer’s parents, legal guardian, or conservator, or authorized
 representatives, determines will best accomplish all or part of that consumer’s program plan.

(B) It is the intent of the Legislature that remote services are an option for individuals when appropriate, necessary, and the individual’s choice. It is further the intent of the Legislature that the authorization of remote services does not result in the reduction of access to in-person services or become a default choice. It is further the intent of the Legislature that there is a fidelity of practice for services and supports provided remotely, and that until February 1, 2028, and after this date as the remote services and supports continue, the State Department of Developmental Services shall track and report on outcomes of these remote services and supports for individuals served and assess if the services and supports are working as intended and for the support and assistance to individuals served pursuant to this act and all of its core
 principles.

(i) Until December 31, 2028, if remotely receiving services or supports listed in this section, or if Medi-Cal covered services received through clinically appropriate telehealth modalities would meaningfully meet the needs identified through the planning team process, individuals and families may choose to receive any of the following services remotely if offered by the authorized service provider:

(I) Day programs, as defined in paragraphs (2), (7), (12), and (16) of subdivision (a) of Section 54302 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations.

(II) Look-alike day programs.

(III) Independent living programs, as defined in paragraph (35) of subdivision (a) of Section 54302 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations.

(IV) Behavioral therapy services, defined in paragraphs (11) to (13), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 54342 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations. Providers providing these services shall adhere to state and federal Medicaid requirements, as established by the State Department of Health Care Services. Behavioral health treatment services or supports provided in accordance with Section 14132.03 that are funded, in whole or in part, with state appropriated funds shall comply with all applicable state and federal statutes, regulations, and Medi-Cal program policies.

(V) Remote administration of clinical assessment activities shall not be done when in-person administration is necessary for the validity, reliability, accuracy, or completeness of the assessment or eligibility determination for the Lanterman Developmental Disabilities Services Act pursuant to Section
 4643.

(VI) An individual’s choice to receive remote delivery of services shall be documented in the individual program plan.

(ii) Beginning in March 2027, the department shall include the following information in quarterly updates to the Legislature, statewide and broken down by regional center:

(I) The number of individuals receiving remote services, including as a percentage of all individuals receiving services and shown both in the aggregate and broken out by service type as listed in clause (i).

(II) The ages of individuals receiving remote services.

(III) Any differences in usage of remote services in rural areas relative to urban areas.

(iii) The department shall report to the Legislature no later than February 1, 2028, survey results regarding all of the following:

(I) A summary of the reasons remote services were authorized, including the types of needs, preferences, or circumstances that led to their use.

(II) Satisfaction of the individuals receiving remote services.

(III) Data derived from service provider reporting, regional center monitoring, and direct feedback from individuals and families, including the duration of use of remote services and supports, to the extent available.

(IV) If participation in remote services contributes to social isolation, diminishes opportunities for community integration, or reduces access
 to meaningful social relationships and activities.

(V) An evaluation of the outcomes for individuals served, including whether or not the remote services and supports are working as intended, considering the fidelity of practice or the extent to which services and supports by service type, as listed under clause (i), are implemented as intended or if there is a diminishment of the service due to the remote nature of service and support delivery.

(iv) Providers shall document the remote services each individual receives on a monthly basis, pursuant to written instructions issued by the department, which shall include the collection of information necessary to comply with this section.

(v) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part
 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement, interpret, or make specific the provisions of this subparagraph by means of written directives or similar instructions.

(C) Vendorization or contracting is the process for identification, selection, and utilization of service vendors or contractors, based on the qualifications and other requirements necessary in order to provide the service.

(D) A regional center may reimburse an individual or agency for services or supports provided to a regional center consumer if the individual or agency has a rate of payment for vendored or contracted services established by the department, pursuant to this division, and is providing services pursuant to an emergency vendorization or has completed the vendorization procedures or has entered into a contract with the regional center and continues to comply with the
 vendorization or contracting requirements. The department shall adopt regulations governing the vendorization process to be utilized by the department, regional centers, vendors, and the individual or agency requesting vendorization.

(E) Regulations shall include, but not be limited to: the vendor application process, and the basis for accepting or denying an application; the qualification and requirements for each category of services that may be provided to a regional center consumer through a vendor; requirements for emergency vendorization; procedures for termination of vendorization; and the procedure for an individual or an agency to appeal a vendorization decision made by the department or regional center.

(F) A regional center may vendorize a licensed facility for exclusive services to persons with developmental disabilities at a capacity equal to or less than the
 facility’s licensed capacity. A facility already licensed on January 1, 1999, shall continue to be vendorized at their full licensed capacity until the facility agrees to vendorization at a reduced capacity.

(G) Effective July 1, 2009, notwithstanding any other law or regulation, a regional center shall not newly vendor a State Department of Social Services licensed 24-hour residential care facility with a licensed capacity of 16 or more beds, unless the facility qualifies for receipt of federal funds under the Medicaid program.

(H) (i) Effective January 1, 2027, a vendor shall not be required to maintain a physical location within a regional center’s service area unless a physical location is required for the delivery of services, such as, but not limited to, in a licensed residential facility. A vendor shall maintain a business address validated by the
 United States Postal Service within the geographic area of the regional center that initially approved that vendor.

(ii) The department may repeal or amend any regulations necessary to implement clause (i), through the Office of Administrative Law.

(4) Notwithstanding subparagraph (D) of paragraph (3), a regional center may contract or issue a voucher for services and supports provided to a consumer or family at a cost not to exceed the maximum rate of payment for that service or support established by the department. If a rate has not been established by the department, the regional center may, for an interim period, contract for a specified service or support with, and establish a rate of payment for, a provider of the service or support necessary to implement a consumer’s individual program plan. Contracts may be negotiated for a period of up to three years, with annual review
 and subject to the availability of funds.

(5) In order to ensure the maximum flexibility and availability of appropriate services and supports for persons with developmental disabilities, the department shall establish and maintain an equitable system of payment to providers of services and supports identified as necessary to the implementation of a consumer’s individual program plan. The system of payment shall include a provision for a rate to ensure that the provider can meet the special needs of consumers and provide quality services and supports in the least restrictive setting as required by law.

(6) The regional center and the consumer, or if appropriate, the consumer’s parents, legal guardian, conservator, or authorized representative, including those appointed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4541, subdivision (b) of Section 4701.6, or subdivision (e) of Section
 4705, shall, pursuant to the individual program plan, consider all of the following when selecting a provider of consumer services and supports:

(A) A provider’s ability to deliver quality services or supports that can accomplish all or part of the consumer’s individual program plan.

(B) A provider’s success in achieving the objectives set forth in the individual program plan.

(C) If appropriate, the existence of licensing, accreditation, or professional certification.

(D) (i) The cost of providing services or supports of comparable quality by different providers, if available, shall be reviewed, and the least costly available provider of comparable service, including the cost of transportation, who is able to accomplish all or
 part of the consumer’s individual program plan, consistent with the particular needs of the consumer and family as identified in the individual program plan, shall be selected. In determining the least costly provider, the availability of federal financial participation shall be considered. The consumer shall not be required to use the least costly provider if it will result in the consumer moving from an existing provider of services or supports to more restrictive or less integrated services or supports.

(ii) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department shall, with input from the community, issue a written directive defining the term “cost effective” for the purposes of all programs, including, but not limited to, the Self-Determination Program, no later than August 1, 2026. This directive
 shall remain in effect until regulations are adopted, but in no case for longer than two years following its issuance. Upon notification by the department to the Legislature that the written directive has been issued, clause (i) shall be ineffective.

(iii) For purposes of clause (ii), input from the community shall include, but not be limited to, consultation with the department’s Lived Experience Advisory Group, individuals and families, caregivers, advocates and associations, service providers, regional centers, the State Council on Developmental Disabilities Statewide Self‑Determination Advisory Committee, and legislative staff. The department shall provide adequate notice, or 45 days at a minimum, for the community to review and provide feedback on the draft written directive, with review and consideration by the department of feedback prior to finalization for the August 1, 2026, deadline.

(E) The consumer’s choice of providers, or, if appropriate, the consumer’s parent’s, legal guardian’s, authorized representative’s, or conservator’s choice of providers.

(7) A service or support provided by an agency or individual shall not be continued unless the consumer or, if appropriate, the consumer’s parents, legal guardian, or conservator, or authorized representative, including those appointed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4541, subdivision (b) of Section 4701.6, or subdivision (e) of Section 4705, is satisfied and the regional center and the consumer or, if appropriate, the consumer’s parents or legal guardian or conservator agree that planned services and supports have been provided, and reasonable progress toward objectives have been made.

(8) Regional center funds shall not be used to supplant the
 budget of an agency that has a legal responsibility to serve all members of the general public and is receiving public funds for providing those services.

(9) (A) To maximize federal financial participation and facilitate timely access to residential placements of consumers in foster care, the department shall enter into interagency agreements to obtain state and federal funding with the state departments that oversee the agencies that have the legal responsibility to serve all members of the general public and receive public funds for providing those services. The interagency agreement shall specify the proportion or amount of funds reimbursed by each state department or other responsible agency. Following completion of the interagency agreement, the departments shall jointly notify the local agencies.

(B) Notwithstanding any other law, and if specified in
 the joint notification received pursuant to subparagraph (A), regional centers shall fund the vendored residential service types specified in the joint notification provided to a regional center consumer who is a child or nonminor dependent who has been adjudged a dependent of the court pursuant to Section 300 or has not been adjudged a dependent of the court pursuant to Section 300 but is in the custody of the county welfare department, or has been adjudged a ward of the court pursuant to Section 601 or 602 and placed in the care and custody of the county probation department. The residential services and supports purchased by the regional center shall be consistent with the consumer’s individual program plan regardless of the placing agency or placing authority. This section shall not apply to placements made in an institution for mental diseases, as defined in Section 435.1010 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(C) This
 paragraph shall be implemented in consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association of California and the Association of Regional Center Agencies.

(10) (A) A regional center may, directly or through an agency acting on behalf of the center, provide placement in, purchase of, or follow-along services to persons with developmental disabilities in, appropriate community living arrangements, including, but not limited to, support service for consumers in homes they own or lease, foster family placements, health care facilities, and licensed community care facilities. In considering appropriate placement alternatives for children with developmental disabilities, approval by the child’s parent or guardian shall be obtained before placement is made.

(B) Effective July 1, 2012, notwithstanding any other law or regulation, a regional center shall not purchase
 residential services from a State Department of Social Services licensed 24-hour residential care facility with a licensed capacity of 16 or more beds. This prohibition on regional center purchase of residential services does not apply to either of the following:

(i) A residential facility with a licensed capacity of 16 or more beds that has been approved to participate in the department’s Home and Community Based Services Waiver or another existing waiver program or certified to participate in the Medi-Cal program.

(ii) A residential facility licensed as a mental health rehabilitation center by the State Department of Health Care Services under any of the following circumstances:

(I) The facility is eligible for Medicaid reimbursement and the individual’s planning team determines that there are no less restrictive
 placements appropriate for the individual.

(II) There is an emergency circumstance in which the regional center determines that it cannot locate alternate federally eligible services to meet the consumer’s needs. Under an emergency circumstance, an assessment shall be completed by the regional center as soon as possible and within 30 days of admission. An individual program plan meeting shall be convened immediately following the assessment to determine the services and supports needed for stabilization and to develop a plan to transition the consumer from the facility into the community. If transition is not expected within 90 days of admission, an individual program plan meeting shall be held to discuss the status of transition and to determine if the consumer is still in need of placement in the facility. Commencing October 1, 2012, this determination shall be made after also considering resource options identified by the statewide
 specialized resource service. If it is determined that emergency services continue to be necessary, the regional center shall submit an updated transition plan that can cover a period of up to 90 days. Placements under these emergency circumstances shall not exceed 180 days.

(III) The clients’ rights advocate shall be notified of each admission and individual program planning meeting pursuant to this clause and may participate in all individual program planning meetings unless the consumer objects on their own behalf. For purposes of this subclause, notification to the clients’ rights advocate shall include a copy of the most recent comprehensive assessment or updated assessment and the time, date, and location of the meeting, and shall be provided as soon as practicable, but not less than seven calendar days before the meeting.

(IV) If a consumer is placed in a mental health
 rehabilitation center by another entity, the mental health rehabilitation center shall inform the regional center of the placement within five days of the date the consumer is admitted. If an individual’s records indicate that the individual is a regional center consumer, the mental health rehabilitation center shall make every effort to contact the local regional center or the department to determine which regional center to provide notice. As soon as possible within 30 days of admission to a mental health rehabilitation center due to an emergency pursuant to subclause (II), or within 30 days of notification of admission to a mental health rehabilitation center by an entity other than a regional center, an assessment shall be completed by the regional center.

(C) (i) Effective July 1, 2012, notwithstanding any other law or regulation, a regional center shall not purchase new residential services from, or place a consumer
 in, institutions for mental disease, as described in Part 5 (commencing with Section 5900) of Division 5, for which federal Medicaid funding is not available. Effective July 1, 2013, this prohibition applies regardless of the availability of federal funding.

(ii) The prohibition described in clause (i) shall not apply to emergencies, as determined by the regional center, if a regional center cannot locate alternate services to meet the consumer’s needs. As soon as possible within 30 days of admission due to an emergency, an assessment shall be completed by the regional center. An individual program plan meeting shall be convened immediately following the assessment, to determine the services and supports needed for stabilization and to develop a plan to transition the consumer from the facility to the community. If transition is not expected within 90 days of admission, an emergency program plan meeting shall be held to discuss the status of
 the transition and to determine if the consumer is still in need of placement in the facility. If emergency services continue to be necessary, the regional center shall submit an updated transition plan to the department for an extension of up to 90 days. Placement shall not exceed 180 days.

(iii) Effective January 1, 2020, the exception in clause (ii) shall no longer apply. As of this date, the prohibition in clause (i) shall not apply to acute crises when the following conditions are met prior to a regional center purchasing new residential services from, or placing a consumer in, an institution for mental disease:

(I) The regional center prepares an assessment for inclusion in the consumer’s file detailing all considered community-based services and supports, including, but not limited to, rate adjustments, as provided by law, supplemental services, as set forth in subparagraph
 (F), emergency and crisis intervention services, as set forth in paragraph (11), community crisis home, pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 4698) of Chapter 6, and an explanation of why those options could not meet the consumer’s needs.

(II) The director of the regional center confirms that there are no community-based options that can meet the consumer’s needs.

(iv) For purposes of this section, “acute crisis” has the same meaning as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 4418.7.

(v) When admission occurs due to an acute crisis, all of the following shall apply:

(I) If the regional center does not expect the consumer to transition back to a community setting within 72 hours, or if the consumer does not transition back to a
 community setting within 72 hours, the regional center shall do both of the following:

(ia) No later than 10 calendar days from the date the consumer is placed in the institution for mental disease, complete any documentation necessary to support the filing of a petition for commitment pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 6 and request the person authorized to present allegations pursuant to Section 6500 file a petition for commitment.

(ib) Complete a comprehensive assessment in coordination with the institution for mental disease staff. The comprehensive assessment shall include the identification of the services and supports needed for crisis stabilization and the timeline for identifying or developing the services and supports needed to transition the consumer back to a community setting. The regional center shall immediately
 submit a copy of the comprehensive assessment to the committing court. Immediately following the assessment, and not later than 30 days following admission, the regional center and the institution for mental disease shall jointly convene an individual program plan meeting to determine the services and supports needed for crisis stabilization and to develop a plan to transition the consumer into the community.

(II) If transition is not expected within 90 days of admission, an individual program plan meeting shall be held to discuss the status of the transition and to determine if the consumer is still in need of crisis stabilization.

(III) A consumer shall reside in an institution for mental disease no longer than six months before being placed into a community living arrangement, unless, prior to the end of the six months, all of the following have occurred:

(ia) The regional center has conducted an additional comprehensive assessment based on current information and determines that the consumer continues to be in an acute crisis.

(ib) The individual program planning team has developed a plan that identifies the specific services and supports necessary to transition the consumer into the community, and the plan includes a timeline to obtain or develop those services and supports.

(ic) The committing court has reviewed and, if appropriate, extended the commitment.

(IV) (ia) A consumer’s placement at an institution for mental disease shall not exceed one year unless both of the following occur:

(Ia) The regional center
 demonstrates significant progress toward implementing the plan to transition the consumer into the community.

(Ib) Extraordinary circumstances exist beyond the regional center’s control that have prevented the regional center from obtaining those services and supports within the timeline based on the plan.

(ib) If both of the circumstances under sub-subclause (ia) exist, the regional center may request, and the committing court may grant, an additional extension of the commitment, not to exceed 30 days.

(V) Institutions for mental disease staff shall assist the consumer with transitioning back to the consumer’s prior residence, or an alternative community-based residential setting, within the timeframe described in this subparagraph.

(vi) The department
 shall monitor placements pursuant to this subparagraph and subsequent transitions back to community-based settings.

(vii) The clients’ rights advocate shall be notified of each admission and individual program planning meeting pursuant to this subparagraph and may participate in all individual program planning meetings unless the consumer objects on their own behalf. For purposes of this clause, notification to the clients’ rights advocate shall include a copy of the most recent comprehensive assessment or updated assessment and the time, date, and location of the meeting, and shall be provided as soon as practicable, but not less than seven calendar days before the meeting.

(viii) If a consumer is placed in an institution for mental disease by another entity, the institution for mental disease shall inform the regional center of the placement within five days of the date the
 consumer is admitted. If an individual’s records indicate that the individual is a regional center consumer, the institution for mental disease shall make every effort to contact the local regional center or department to determine which regional center to provide notice. As soon as possible within 30 days of admission to an institution for mental disease due to an acute crisis pursuant to clause (ii), or within 30 days of notification of admission to an institution for mental disease by an entity other than a regional center, an assessment shall be completed by the regional center.

(ix) Regional centers shall complete a comprehensive assessment of a consumer residing in an institution for mental disease as of July 1, 2012, for which federal Medicaid funding is not available, and for a consumer residing in an institution for mental disease as of July 1, 2013, without regard to federal funding. The comprehensive assessment shall be completed
 before the consumer’s next scheduled individual program plan meeting and shall include identification of the services and supports needed and the timeline for identifying or developing those services needed to transition the consumer back to the community. Effective October 1, 2012, the regional center shall also consider resource options identified by the statewide specialized resource service. For each individual program plan meeting convened pursuant to this subparagraph, the clients’ rights advocate for the regional center shall be notified of the meeting and may participate in the meeting unless the consumer objects on their own behalf. For purposes of this clause, notification to the clients’ rights advocate shall include the time, date, and location of the meeting, and shall be provided as soon as practicable, but not less than seven calendar days before the meeting.

(D) (i) The transition process from a mental
 health rehabilitation center or institution for mental disease shall be based upon the individual’s needs, developed through the individual program plan process, and shall ensure that needed services and supports will be in place at the time the individual moves. Individual supports and services shall include, if appropriate for the individual, wraparound services through intensive individualized support services. The transition shall be to a community living arrangement that is in the least restrictive environment appropriate to the needs of the individual and most protective of the individual’s rights to dignity, freedom, and choice as described in subdivision (a).

(ii) Regional centers, through the individual program plan process, shall coordinate for the benefit of the regional center consumers residing in an institution for mental disease, pretransition planning, transition, and access to followup services to help ensure a smooth
 transition to the community. Individual support services shall include, but shall not be limited to, both of the following:

(I) Defined regional center contacts and visits with consumers and service providers during the 12 months following the consumer’s movement date.

(II) Identification of issues that need resolution and an individualized support plan to address these issues.

(E) A person with developmental disabilities placed by the regional center in a community living arrangement shall have the rights specified in this division. These rights shall be brought to the person’s attention by any means necessary to reasonably communicate these rights to each resident, provided that, at a minimum, the State Department of Developmental Services prepare, provide, and require to be clearly posted in all residential
 facilities and day programs a poster using simplified language and pictures that is designed to be more understandable by persons with intellectual disabilities and that the rights information shall also be available through the regional center to each residential facility and day program in alternative formats, including, but not limited to, other languages, braille, and audiotapes, if necessary to meet the communication needs of consumers.

(F) Consumers are eligible to receive supplemental services including, but not limited to, additional staffing, pursuant to the process described in subdivision (d) of Section 4646. Necessary additional staffing that is not specifically included in the rates paid to the service provider may be purchased by the regional center if the additional staff are in excess of the amount required by regulation and the individual’s planning team determines the additional services are consistent with the provisions of
 the individual program plan. Additional staff should be periodically reviewed by the planning team for consistency with the individual program plan objectives in order to determine if continued use of the additional staff is necessary and appropriate and if the service is producing outcomes consistent with the individual program plan. Regional centers shall monitor programs to ensure that the additional staff is being provided and utilized appropriately.

(11) Emergency and crisis intervention services, including, but not limited to, mental health services and behavior modification services, may be provided, as needed, to maintain persons with developmental disabilities in the living arrangement of their own choice. Crisis services shall first be provided without disrupting a person’s living arrangement. If crisis intervention services are unsuccessful, emergency housing shall be available in the person’s home community. If dislocation cannot be
 avoided, every effort shall be made to return the person to their living arrangement of choice, with all necessary supports, as soon as possible.

(12) Among other service and support options, planning teams shall consider the use of paid roommates or neighbors, personal assistance, technical and financial assistance, and all other service and support options that would result in greater self-sufficiency for the consumer and cost-effectiveness to the state.

(13) If facilitation specified in an individual program plan requires the services of an individual, the facilitator shall be of the consumer’s choosing.

(14) The community support may be provided to assist individuals with developmental disabilities to fully participate in community and civic life, including, but not limited to, programs, services, work
 opportunities, business, and activities available to persons without disabilities. This facilitation shall include, but not be limited to, any of the following:

(A) Outreach and education to programs and services within the community.

(B) Direct support to individuals that would enable them to more fully participate in their community.

(C) Developing unpaid natural supports when possible.

(15) If feasible and recommended by the individual program planning team, for purposes of facilitating better and cost-effective services for consumers or family members, technology, including telecommunication technology, may be used in conjunction with other services and supports. Technology in lieu of a consumer’s in-person appearances at judicial proceedings or
 administrative due process hearings may be used only if the consumer or, if appropriate, the consumer’s parent, legal guardian, conservator, or authorized representative, gives informed consent. Technology may be used in lieu of, or in conjunction with, in-person training for providers, as appropriate.

(16) Other services and supports may be provided as set forth in Sections 4685, 4686, 4687, 4688, and 4689, when necessary.

(17) Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, effective July 1, 2009, regional centers shall not purchase experimental treatments, therapeutic services, or devices that have not been clinically determined or scientifically proven to be effective or safe or for which risks and complications are unknown. Experimental treatments or therapeutic services include experimental medical or nutritional therapy when the use of the product for that purpose is not a
 general physician practice. For regional center consumers receiving these services as part of their individual program plan (IPP) or individualized family service plan (IFSP) on July 1, 2009, this prohibition shall apply on August 1, 2009.

(b) (1) Advocacy for, and protection of, the civil, legal, and service rights of persons with developmental disabilities as established in this division.

(2) If the advocacy efforts of a regional center to secure or protect the civil, legal, or service rights of a consumer prove ineffective, the regional center or the person with developmental disabilities or the person’s parents, legal guardian, or other representative may request advocacy assistance from the state council.

(c) The regional center may assist consumers and families directly, or through a
 provider, in identifying and building circles of support within the community.
